test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-kissa_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: "lookup -flags mbTT"

Tests:
  Noun - kissá: # á-stems
    kissá+N+Sg+Nom: kissá
    kissá+N+Sg+Gen: kiṣá
    kissá+N+Sg+Acc: kiṣá
    kissá+N+Sg+Ill: kiiṣán
    kissá+N+Sg+Loc: kissáást
    kissá+N+Sg+Com: kissáin
    kissá+N+Sg+Abe: kiṣáttáá
    kissá+N+Ess: kissán
    kissá+N+Par: kissád
    kissá+N+Pl+Nom: kiṣáh
    kissá+N+Pl+Gen: kiṣái
    kissá+N+Pl+Acc: kissáid
    kissá+N+Pl+Ill: kissáid
    kissá+N+Pl+Loc: kissáin
    kissá+N+Pl+Com: kiṣáiguin
    kissá+N+Pl+Abe: kiṣáittáá
